Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 28.22.301.
Policy interpretation.

A provision in this chapter may not be interpreted to prohibit a motor vehicle liability policy from including limitations, conditions, exceptions, exclusions, or other provisions that do not violate the requirements of this chapter or other applicable laws.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Sec. 28.22.311.
Definition.

In this chapter, “motor vehicle liability policy” means an owner’s policy, an operator’s policy, or a personal policy that

meets the requirements of AS

28.22.101

; and

is issued by an insurance carrier authorized to transact business in the state to or for the benefit of the person named as insured.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Sec. 28.22.321.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Mandatory Automobile Insurance Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Secs. 28.22.500 — 28.22.600.
Miscellaneous provisions. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]